Hawaii statutes.
[§342I-6] Recordkeeping. All
facilities accepting five or more lead acid batteries per day from an
individual shall maintain records for three years that provide, at a minimum,
the following information:

(1) The name, phone number, and address of the person
from whom the batteries were received;

(2) The date of receipt of the lead acid batteries;
and

(3) The record of shipment indicating the ultimate
destination of the lead acid batteries and the date of shipment. [L 1991, c
201, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next